Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-118
Telecommunications common carrier, defined.

Telecommunications common carrier means a provider of telecommunications service for hire which offers telecommunications service to the general public at large in Nebraska intrastate commerce.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 19.